Louisiana, session 2026, HB224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Articles 603(4)(a), (14), (15), (17)(l), and (20), 616(F),
622(B)(4), 623(A), (D), and (E), 624(B) and (C), 631(B), 646(A) and (C), 672.3(C)(3),
679(B) through (F), 690(B)(3), 694(A), 695(A), (C), and (D), 696(B), 702(D)(2)(c), 704(A),
705(A), (C), and (D), 706(B), 740, 1004(G), 1112(B), 1269.1, 1269.2(B) and (C), 1269.7,
1279.6(A)(1), (B), and (C), 1404(1), and 1427(C)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (a) are
Page 1 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
hereby amended and reenacted and Children's Code Articles 603(33), 646(F), 658.1, and
1003(15) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 603. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(4)(a) "Caretaker" means any person legally obligated to provide or secure
adequate care for a child, including a parent, tutor, guardian, legal custodian, foster
parent caregiver, an operator or employee of a residential or treatment facility
licensed by the Department of Children and Family Services department or the
Louisiana Department of Health, or other person providing a residence for the child.
"Caretaker" shall not include an operator or employee of a correctional facility,
detention facility, nonresidential school, or unlicensed residential or child care
provider.
* * *
(14) "Foster care" means placement in that the child is in the custody of the
department and the department is providing temporary services including care by a
foster family home caregiver, a relative's home relative, a residential child caring
facility, or other living arrangement approved and supervised by the state for
provision of substitute care for a child in the department's custody. Such placement
shall not include a detention facility.
(15) "Foster parent caregiver" means an individual who provides residential
foster a home and care with the approval and under the supervision of the department
for a child in its custody.
* * *
(17) "Mandatory reporter" is any of the following individuals:
* * *
(l) A foster parent caregiver.
* * *
(20) "Other suitable individual" means a person, other than a relative, with
whom the child or parent enjoys a close, established, significant relationship, yet not
Page 2 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
a blood relative, including a neighbor, godparent, teacher, or close friend of the
parent, or similarly situated individual.
* * *
(33) "Intervention" means an action by which a relative or other suitable
individual may participate formally in a proceeding to facilitate permanency or to
present evidence that it would be in the best interest of a child for the intervenor to
be awarded custody of the child, visitation with the child, or another remedy.
* * *
Art. 616. Registry; screening of CASA volunteers, staff, and board members;
confidentiality
* * *
F. Information from investigations of reports that are inconclusive may be
disclosed, with the applicant's written consent, for the limited purposes of evaluating
the applicant to be a foster parent caregiver, an adoptive parent, or a caregiver
pursuant to R.S. 46:56(F)(11).
* * *
Art. 622. Placement pending a continued custody hearing
* * *
B. Unless the best interest of the child requires a different placement, a child
who appears to be a child in need of care and whose immediate removal is necessary
shall be placed, pending a continued custody hearing, in accordance with the
following priorities of placement:
* * *
(4) In foster care under the supervision of the department until further orders
of the court.
* * *
Page 3 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
Art. 623. Notice; right to be heard
A. The department shall give notice of any order regarding the child issued
in accordance with Article 619(C) or 620 to the child's parents,; the district defender
or other entity designated for the jurisdiction by the Indigent Parents' Representation
Program for representing parents,; the entity designated for the jurisdiction by the
Louisiana Supreme Court to provide qualified, independent counsel for the child,;
and other parties. The department shall also give notice regarding any child in foster
care, to any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, and relative providing care.
The department shall notify the court of each party's address and shall have a
continuing duty to provide current information to the court about each party's
whereabouts.
* * *
D. If a foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child fails to appear at a hearing, the department shall report to the court
whether notice was given or, if not, what diligent efforts were made to locate and
notify the absent person. The court may permit the hearing to be held in the person's
absence.
E. The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or
relative providing care for the child who appears for the hearing.
Art. 624. Continued custody hearing; continued safety plan hearing; federal Indian
Child Welfare Act
* * *
B. After notice to all parties, and when a child is in foster care, to any foster
parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, and relative providing care, and upon a
showing of good cause, the court may grant, deny, or condition a requested
continuance of the proceeding in accordance with the best interests interest of the
child. The hearing may be continued for up to three additional days. If a
continuance is granted, the court shall issue a written order identifying the mover and
reciting the particular facts justifying the continuance.
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
C.(1) If a parent is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or
include in the minutes whether notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing and
the right to attend and be heard was properly provided by the department. If it
appears from the record that, after diligent efforts by the department, the parent
cannot be found or has been served a summons or notified by the department to
appear at the continued custody or continued safety plan hearing and fails to appear
at the hearing, then the court may permit the hearing may to be held in the parent's
absence.
(2) If a foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, adoptive parent, or
relative providing care for the child fails to appear at the hearing, the department
shall report to is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or include in the
minutes whether notice was given, or, if not, what of the date, time, and place of the
hearing and the right to attend and be heard was properly provided by the
department. If the court determines that diligent efforts were made by the
department to locate and notify the absent person,. The the court may permit the
hearing to be held in the person's absence.
* * *
Art. 631. Authority to file petition; custody
* * *
B. At any time prior to adjudication, any person, including a relative of the
child, may petition the court for the provisional or permanent legal custody of the
child.
* * *
Art. 646. Answer; appearance; objection
A. The court shall require the parent to appear and to answer the petition at
any time prior to the adjudication hearing but no later than fifteen days after the
filing of the petition. If a parent is absent, the court shall make written findings of
fact or include in the minutes whether notice of the date, time, and place of the
hearing and the right to attend and be heard was properly served.
* * *
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
C. At the appearance, the court may either convene immediately a prehearing
conference authorized by Article 646.1, or set a date for the conference.
* * *
F. If a child is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or include
in the minutes whether the attorney for a child who is twelve years of age or older
moved to waive the presence of the child or whether the attorney for the child or the
court requested the presence of a child who is under the age of twelve years. If
presence was not waived or the child is not present after a request, the custodian or
the department shall provide reasons for the absence of the child, and the court shall
determine on the record whether the hearing may proceed.
* * *
Art. 658.1. Motion for intervention
A. At any stage of a proceeding, upon written motion to intervene and after
a contradictory hearing, the court may allow a relative or other suitable individual
to intervene on behalf of himself or a party if good cause is shown that intervention
is in the best interest of the child and, after adjudication, will facilitate permanency
for the child. The court may deny the motion to intervene or set a contradictory
hearing with notice to all parties.
B.(1) An intervenor is entitled to notice of any hearing and to present
evidence relevant to the best interest of the child.
(2) Unless good cause is shown, an intervenor shall not participate in or
present evidence at an adjudication hearing except when called as a witness by a
party. An intervenor shall not inspect or copy any record of the case before an in
camera inspection by the court and an opportunity to be heard by the parties.
C. The court may exclude an intervenor from any part of a hearing as
necessary to protect the privacy interests of the parent or child.
D. After a hearing, the court shall dismiss an intervention upon a
determination that the intervention is no longer in the best interest of the child.
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
E. This Article shall not be construed to require intervention for a relative
or other suitable individual to be awarded custody of the child, visitation with the
child, or another remedy.
* * *
Art. 672.3. Diligent search for relatives; notice; failure to respond
* * *
C. All relatives of the child identified in the diligent search required by this
Article, subject to exceptions due to family or domestic violence or other safety
concerns, shall be provided with a notice that does all of the following:
* * *
(3) Describes the process for becoming a licensed foster family home
caregiver and the additional services and supports support available for children
placed in approved foster homes in foster care.
* * *
Art. 679. Notice; presence at disposition
* * *
B. If a parent is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or
include in the minutes whether notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing and
the right to attend and be heard was properly served. The court shall permit a
disposition hearing to be held in the absence of a parent if it is established on the
record that the parent was served but is not in attendance or that efforts to serve the
parent have been unsuccessful.
C. A child twelve years of age or older shall be present in court unless his
the child's presence is waived by the court upon motion of the child's counsel. A
child below the age of twelve years shall be present in court upon the request of
counsel for the child or the court. If a child is absent, the court shall make written
findings of fact or include in the minutes whether the attorney for the child moved
to waive the presence or whether presence was requested. If presence was not waived
or the child is not present after a request, the custodian or the department shall
provide reasons for the absence of the child, and the court shall determine on the
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
record whether the hearing may proceed. If the A child is present in court, he may
choose to testify as to his wishes, and the court shall consider his the child's
testimony in the matter. Any testimony given by a child may be taken by a
videotaped interview or by closed-circuit television, as authorized by Chapter 8 of
Title III of this Code, or by an in-chambers conference attended only by the judge
and court reporter and by counsel for the child, for the petitioner, and for the parents.
D. The department shall give notice of the right to appear at the disposition
hearing to any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child.
E. If a foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child fails to appear at the disposition hearing, the department shall report to
is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or include in the minutes
whether notice was given, or, if not, what of the date, time, and place of the hearing
and the right to attend and be heard was properly provided by the department. If the
court determines that diligent efforts were made by the department to locate and
notify the absent person,. The the court may permit the hearing to be held in the
person's absence.
F. The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or
relative providing care for the child who appears for the hearing.
* * *
Art. 690. Case review report purpose; contents
* * *
B. The case review report shall address the following:
* * *
(3) The extent of progress which that has been made toward alleviating or
mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.
* * *
Art. 694. Notice; absent parents
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
A. If a parent is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or
include in the minutes whether notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing and
the right to attend and be heard was properly served. The court shall permit a case
review hearing to be held in the absence of a parent if it is established on the record
that the parent was served but is not in attendance or that efforts to serve the parent
have been unsuccessful.
* * *
Art. 695. Notice; foster parents caregiver, pre-adoptive parents, relatives providing
care; right to be heard
A. The department shall give notice of the right to appear at each case review
hearing to any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child.
* * *
C. If a foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child fails to appear at a case review hearing, the department shall report to
is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or include in the minutes
whether notice was given or, if not, what of the date, time, and place of the hearing
and the right to attend and be heard was properly provided by the department. If the
court determines that diligent efforts were made by the department to locate and
notify the absent person,. The the court may permit the hearing to be held in the
person's absence.
D. The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or
relative providing care for the child who appears for the hearing.
Art. 696. Rights of parties
* * *
B. A child twelve years of age or older shall be present in court unless his
the child's presence is waived by the court upon motion of the child's counsel. A
child below the age of twelve years shall be present in court upon the request of
counsel for the child or the court. If a child is absent, the court shall make written
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
findings of fact or include in the minutes whether the attorney for the child moved
to waive the presence or whether presence was requested. If presence was not
waived or the child is not present after a request, the custodian or the department
shall provide reasons for the absence of the child, and the court shall determine on
the record whether the hearing may proceed. If the A child is present in court, he
may choose to testify as to his wishes, and the court shall consider his the child's
testimony in the matter. Any testimony given by a child may be taken by a
videotaped interview or by closed-circuit television, as authorized by Chapter 8 of
Title III of this Code, or by an in-chambers conference attended only by the judge
and court reporter and by counsel for the child, for the petitioner, and for the parents.
* * *
Art. 702. Permanency hearing
* * *
D.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(c) For the purposes of Subsubparagraph (a) of this Subparagraph, a foster
parent caregiver, relative, or other suitable individual with whom a child under the
age of six has resided continuously for nine months or more is a person who has a
significant relationship with the child. Nothing in this Subparagraph shall be
construed to interfere with any rights afforded to biological parents.
* * *
Art. 704. Notice; absent parents
A. If a parent is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or
include in the minutes whether notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing and
the right to attend and be heard was properly served. The court shall permit a
permanency hearing to be held in the absence of a parent if it is established on the
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
record that the parent was served but is not in attendance or that efforts to serve the
parent have been unsuccessful.
* * *
Art. 705. Notice; right to be heard
A. The department shall give notice of the right to appear at each
permanency hearing to any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative
providing care for the child.
* * *
C. If a foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care
for the child fails to appear at a permanency hearing, the department shall report to
is absent, the court shall make written findings of fact or include in the minutes
whether notice was given or, if not, what of the date, time, and place of the hearing
and the right to attend and be heard was properly provided by the department. If the
court determines that diligent efforts were made by the department to locate and
notify the absent person,. The the court may permit the hearing to be held in the
person's absence.
D. The court shall solicit and consider information regarding the care and
treatment of the child from any foster parent caregiver, pre-adoptive parent, or
relative providing care for the child who appears for the hearing.
Art. 706. Rights of parties
* * *
B. A child twelve years of age or older shall be present in court unless his
the child's presence is waived by the court upon motion of the child's counsel. A
child below the age of twelve years shall be present in court upon the request of
counsel for the child or the court. If a child is absent, the court shall make written
findings of fact or include in the minutes whether the attorney for the child moved
to waive the presence or whether presence was requested. If presence was not
waived or the child is not present after a request, the custodian or the department
shall provide reasons for the absence of the child, and the court shall determine on
the record whether the hearing may proceed. If the A child is present in court, he
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
may choose to testify as to his wishes, and the court shall consider his the child's
testimony in the matter. Any testimony given by a child may be taken by a
videotaped interview or by closed-circuit television, as authorized by Chapter 8 of
Title III of this Code, or by an in-chambers conference attended only by the judge
and court reporter and by counsel for the child, for the petitioner, and for the parents.
* * *
Art. 740. Advice of rights
A. At the continued custody hearing or at the first hearing at which the child
appears, whichever occurs first, the court judge shall advise the parents and the child,
in a developmentally appropriate manner and in terms understandable by to the child
and the parents, of all of the following:
(1) The child, parents, and any other persons subject to the jurisdiction of the
court in accordance with Article 729 are parties to the proceeding.
(2) The nature of the proceedings as provided in Article 792.
(3) The consequences of formal proceedings including all of the following:
(a) The possibility of juvenile detention if the child is held in contempt in
accordance with Article 791.
(b) The possibility of a fine or imprisonment if an adult is held in contempt
in accordance with Article 1509.
(c) The possibility of removal of the child from his home in accordance with
Article 779.
(2)(4) The nature of the allegations.
(3)(5) The informal family services plan procedure.
(4) The right to an adjudication hearing.
(5) The right to retain and be represented by an attorney.
(6) The nature of Families in Need of Services proceedings as set forth in
Article 792 and the confidentiality of Families in Need of Services records as set
forth provided in Article 793.
(7) The right to have notice of and attend all hearings.
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
(8) The right to be free from discrimination based on race, religion,
disability, national origin, and sex.
(9) The right to be provided qualified interpretation, translation, and
language assistance services.
(10) The right to be provided reasonable accommodations for any disability.
(11) The right of the child to an adjudication hearing.
(12) The right of the child to have regular and meaningful communication
with the child's attorney in a way that is understandable to the child.
(13) The right of the child to have the child's attorney present the child's
case, including presenting the child's wishes.
(14) The right of the child to testify as to the child's wishes.
(15) The right of the parent to retain and be represented by an independent
and qualified attorney who shall have duties of loyalty, confidentiality, advocacy,
and competent representation.
B. If a petition seeking a formal adjudication is filed, the court shall appoint
independent legal counsel for the child, or refer the child for representation by the
district public defender. Neither the child nor anyone purporting to act on his behalf
of the child may be permitted to waive this right. If the court finds that the parents
of the child are financially able, it may order the parents to pay some or all of the
costs of the child's representation.
C. If a petition seeking a formal adjudication is filed, the court shall also
advise the child and parent of his the privilege against self-incrimination.
D. Written notice of the rights provided in Paragraph A of this Article shall
be given to the child and the parents and, if present at the hearing, foster caregivers,
pre-adoptive parents, and any relatives providing care to the child.
* * *
Art. 1003. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
(15) "Foster care" means that the child is in the custody of the department
and the department is providing temporary services including care by a foster
caregiver, a relative, a residential child caring facility, or other living arrangement
approved and supervised by the state.
Art. 1004. Petition for termination of parental rights; authorization to file
* * *
G. Foster parents A foster caregiver who intend intends to adopt the child
may petition for the termination of parental rights of the foster child's parents when,
in accordance with Article 702(D), adoption is the permanent plan for the child, the
child has been in state custody under the foster parent's caregiver's care for seventeen
of the last twenty-two months, and the department has failed to petition for such
termination.
* * *
Art. 1112. Inability due to court intervention
* * *
B. Upon notice to the department and after a contradictory hearing, if
requested by the department, a parent may, with approval of the court, execute a
private surrender of a child in the legal custody of the department to the foster parent
with whom the child was placed by the department caregiver.
* * *
Art. 1269.1. Continuing contact agreements; voluntary
Agreements for continuing contact by certain biological relatives or foster
parents caregivers with an adopted child after an adoption do not violate any public
policy of this state, provided that the adopting parents and biological relative or
foster parent caregiver voluntarily execute the agreement in conformity with the
requirements of this Chapter.
Art. 1269.2. Continuing post-adoption contact; foster child adoptions adoption of
child in foster care
* * *
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
B. If there is no parental relationship that meets the requirements of
Paragraph A of this Article, the court may approve an agreement, executed in
conformity with the requirements of this Chapter, that provides for continuing
contact between the child to be adopted and any other relative or foster parent
caregiver whose relationship with the child meets those requirements.
C. When adoption is approved by the court as the permanent plan for the
child, the department shall inform any parent, grandparent, sibling, or any other
relative, or foster parent caregiver who meets the requirements of Paragraph A or B
of this Article of the possibility of post-adoption contact with the child upon
agreement with the adoptive parents in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter.
* * *
Art. 1269.7. Agreements confected after final decree
The adoptive parent and any relative or foster parent caregiver who may be
permitted continuing contact by in accordance with Article 1269.2(B) may enter into
an agreement regarding communication or contact after entry of a final decree of
adoption. Any such The agreement shall be enforceable only if filed with the court
and approved in accordance with this Chapter.
* * *
Art. 1279.6. Educational opportunities and assistance
A.(1) A child who is in foster care pursuant to placement through the
department shall be allowed to remain enrolled in the public school in which the
child was enrolled at the time he the child entered foster care for the duration of the
child's stay in the custody of the state or until he the child completes the highest
grade offered at the school, if the department determines that remaining in such that
school is in the best interest of the child. Transportation of the child shall be
provided pursuant to R.S. 17:238(C).
* * *
B. When a child is in the custody of the department and is placed with a
foster parents caregiver who have has other children living in the home who already
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
attend a nonpublic or parochial school, the foster child may attend the same
nonpublic or parochial school if the department finds that it is in the best interest of
the child, and if the child meets the admission requirements of the nonpublic or
parochial school. The department shall not be directly responsible for paying for the
expenses associated with such education.
C. When a child is in the custody of the department and is placed with a
foster parents caregiver who have has other children in the home who are
participants in an approved home study program, pursuant to R.S. 17:236.1, the
department may approve the placement of the foster child in an approved home study
program if the department finds that it is in the best interest of the child. Home study
programs approved by the Department of Education to educate foster children in
foster care shall offer a sustained curriculum of quality at least equal to that offered
by public schools at the same grade level, pursuant to R.S. 17:236.1(C)(1).
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of
Education shall provide the department, upon request, verification that a home study
program in which a foster child in foster care is participating has been approved
pursuant to R.S. 17:236. The foster parent caregiver shall provide the department
appropriate documentation, including but not limited to copies of standardized tests,
to substantiate that the child is progressing on grade level and at a rate equal to one
grade level for each year in the program.
* * *
Art. 1404. Definitions
As used in this Title:
(1) "Caretaker" means any person legally obligated to provide or secure
adequate care for a child, including a parent, tutor, guardian, legal custodian, foster
home parent caregiver, or other person providing a residence for the child.
* * *
Art. 1427. Authority to transport and detain
* * *
Page 16 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 224 ENROLLED
C.(1) In addition to other persons authorized by this Article to transport to
a treatment facility a child in whose name an emergency certificate has been issued,
any of the following persons may also accompany the child during such
transportation:
(a) A parent, including a foster parent caregiver, subject to the conditions of
Subparagraph (2) of this Paragraph.
* * *
Section 2. Children's Code Articles 650, 697, and 707 are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in Children's Code Articles 603 and 1003
and to correct any cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs, if necessary, consistent
with the provisions of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 17 of 17
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.